Washington statutes.
RCW 11.12.260

Separate writing may direct disposition of tangible personal property—Requirements.

(1) A will or a trust of which the decedent is a grantor and which by its terms becomes irrevocable upon or before the grantor's death may refer to a writing that directs disposition of tangible personal property not otherwise specifically disposed of by the will or trust other than property used primarily in trade or business. Such a writing shall not be effective unless: (a) An unrevoked will or trust refers to the writing, (b) the writing is either in the handwriting of, or signed by, the testator or grantor, and (c) the writing describes the items and the recipients of the property with reasonable certainty.

(2) The writing may be written or signed before or after the execution of the will or trust and need not have significance apart from its effect upon the dispositions of property made by the will or trust. A writing that meets the requirements of this section shall be given effect as if it were actually contained in the will or trust itself, except that if any person designated to receive property in the writing dies before the testator or grantor, the property shall pass as further directed in the writing and in the absence of any further directions, the disposition shall lapse and, in the case of a will, RCW 11.12.110 shall not apply to such lapse.

(3) The testator or grantor may make subsequent handwritten or signed changes to any writing. If there is an inconsistent disposition of tangible personal property as between writings, the most recent writing controls.

(4) As used in this section "tangible personal property" means articles of personal or household use or ornament, for example, furniture, furnishings, automobiles, boats, airplanes, and jewelry, as well as precious metals in any tangible form, for example, bullion or coins. The term includes articles even if held for investment purposes and encompasses tangible property that is not real property. The term does not include mobile homes or intangible property, for example, money that is normal currency or normal legal tender, evidences of indebtedness, bank accounts or other monetary deposits, documents of title, or securities.

[ 2007 c 475 s 3; 1985 c 23 s 4. Prior: 1984 c 149 s 7.]

NOTES:

Short title—Application—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.

Purpose—Application—Severability—1985 c 23: See notes following RCW 11.12.250.

Severability—Effective dates—1984 c 149: See notes following RCW 11.02.005.